Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-2028
Retirement; disability; exceptions.

No officer shall receive any disability benefit payments when there remains to his or her credit unused annual leave or sick leave or under any other circumstances if during the period of disability there has been no impairment of his or her compensation.

Laws 1947, c. 211, § 13(2), p. 691;

R.S.1943, (1978), § 60-455;

Laws 1991, LB 549, § 56.